tr: Püskürtme başlığı: Sabit; Yok; Çıkarılabilir; Diğer
es: Cabezal de rosa: Fijo; Ninguno; Despegables; Otros
nl: Sproeikopbevestiging: Vast; Geen; Uitneembaar; Overig
it: Accessorio a rosa: Fisso; Nessuna; Rimovibili; Altro
bg-BG: Приставка-роза: Фиксирано; Няма; Подвижно; Друго
pt-BR: Acessório de borrifador: Fixo; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
fr: Type de pomme d’arrosage: Fixé; Aucune; Repositionnable; Autre
sk-SK: Ružicový nástavec: Pevná; Žiadne; Odnímateľná; Iné
zh-CN: 喷头附件: 固定; 无; 可拆卸; 其他
nb: Rosetilbehør: Fast; Ingen; Avtakbar; Annet
ru: Наличие розетки: Фиксированный; Нет; Съемный; Другое
ja: ハス口アタッチメント: 固定; なし; 取り外し可能; その他
el: Υποδοχή ροζέτας: Σταθερό; Καμία; Αφαιρούμενο; Άλλο
vi: Phụ kiện đầu vòi sen: Cố định; Không có; Tháo rời được; Khác
hu: Rózsa tartozék: Rögzített; Egyik sem; Eltávolítható; Egyéb
sv: Rosmunstycke: Fast; Inga; Avtagbar; Annat
hr-HR: Nastavak u obliku ruže: Fiksno; Nema; Uklonjivo; Ostalo
zh-TW: 噴頭配件: 固定; 無; 可拆式; 其他
pt-PT: Acessório difusor: Fixo; Nenhum; Removível; Outro
cs: Růžice: Napevno; Neupevněno; Odnímatelné; Jiné
lt-LT: Laistymo rozetės tipas: Fiksuotas; Nėra; Nuimamas; Kita
pl: Zdejmowana głowica rozpylająca: Stałe; Brak; Wymienne; Inne
en: Rose attachment: Fixed; None; Removable; Other
da: Rosepåsats: Fast; Ingen; Aftagelig; Andet
sl-SI: Priključek za brizgalno glavo: Fiksna; Brez; Odstranljivo; Druga
fi: Ruusukelisäosa: Pysyvä; Ei mitään; Irrotettava; Muu
ko: 로즈 노즐 부착 여부: 고정; 없음; 제거 가능; 기타
th: หัวฉีดสเปรย์: แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; ไม่มี; ถอดออกได้; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Atașarea difuzorului: Fix; Niciunul; Detașabil; Altele
de: Befestigung des Brausekopfes: Befestigt; Keine; Abtrennbar; Sonstiges